Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 78.5520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Hazardous position" for employees who began participating in the County
Employees Retirement System prior to September 1, 2008, means:
1. Any position whose principal duties involve active law enforcement,
including the positions of probation and parole officer, active fire
suppression or prevention, correctional officers with duties that
routinely and regularly require face-to-face contact with inmates, or
other positions, including but not limited to paramedics and emergency
medical technicians, with duties that require frequent exposure to a high
degree of danger or peril and also require a high degree of physical
conditioning; and
2. Code enforcement officers employed by a consolidated local
government pursuant to KRS Chapter 67C with duties including but
not limited to investigation, inspection, and issuance of citations for
violations of ordinances relating to facilities, hazardous materials,
land development, and zoning, and with duties that require frequent
exposure to a high degree of danger or peril and also require a high
degree of physical conditioning; and
(b) "Hazardous position" for employees who begin participating in the County
Employees Retirement System on or after September 1, 2008, means:
1. Police officers and firefighters as defined in KRS 61.315(1),
paramedics, correctional officers with duties that routinely and regularly
require face-to-face contact with inmates, and emergency medical
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 982
technicians, if:
a.[1.] The employee's duties require frequent exposure to a high degree
of danger or peril and a high degree of physical conditioning; and
b.[2.] The employee's duties are not primarily clerical or administrative;
and
2. Code enforcement officers employed by a consolidated local
government pursuant to KRS Chapter 67C with duties including but
not limited to investigation, inspection, and the issuance of citations
for violations of ordinances relating to facilities, hazardous materials,
land development, and zoning, if:
a. The employee's duties require frequent exposure to a high
degree of danger or peril and a high degree of physical
conditioning; and
b. The employee's duties are not primarily clerical or
administrative.
(2) (a) Each employer may request of the board hazardous coverage for those
positions as defined in subsection (1) of this section. Upon request, each
employer shall certify to the system, in the manner prescribed by the board,
the names of all employees working in a hazardous position as defined in
subsection (1) of this section for which coverage is requested. The
certification of the employer shall bear the approval of the agent or agency
responsible for the budget of the employer indicating that the required
employer contributions have been provided for in the budget of the employer.
The system shall determine whether the employees whose names have been
certified by the employer are working in positions meeting the definition of a
hazardous position as provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Each employer shall also certify, under penalty of perjury in accordance with
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 982
KRS Chapter 523, that each employee's actual job duties are accurately
reflected in the job description provided to the system. The system shall
determine whether the employees whose names have been certified by the
employer are working in positions meeting the definition of a hazardous
position as defined in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The board shall have the authority to remove any employee from hazardous
coverage if the board determines the employee is not working in a hazardous
position or if the employee is classified in a hazardous position but has
individual job duties that do not meet the definition of a hazardous position or
are not accurately reflected in the job descriptions filed by the employer with
the system.
(3) (a) If the employer participated in the system prior to electing hazardous
coverage, the employer may pay to the system the cost of converting the
nonhazardous service to hazardous service from the date of participation to
the date the payment is made, or the employer may establish a payment
schedule for payment of the cost of the hazardous service above that which
would be funded within the existing employer contribution rate. The employer
may extend the payment schedule to a maximum of thirty (30) years.
Payments made by the employer under this subsection shall be deposited to
the retirement allowance account of the proper retirement or retiree health
fund and shall not be considered accumulated contributions of the individual
members.
(b) If the employer elects not to make the additional payment as provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the employee may pay the cost of converting
the service and provide payment for the cost as provided by KRS 61.552(9).
Payments made by the employee under this subsection shall not be picked up,
as described in KRS 78.610(4), by the employer.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 982
(c) If neither the employer nor employee makes the payment, the service prior to
hazardous position coverage shall remain nonhazardous.
(d) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to members who begin
participating in the system on or after January 1, 2014.
(4) Any person employed in a hazardous position shall be required to undergo a
thorough medical examination by a licensed physician, and a copy of the medical
report of the physician shall be retained on file by the person's employer and made
available to the system upon request.
(5) If doubt exists regarding the benefits payable to a hazardous position employee
under this section, the board shall determine the benefits payable under KRS 78.510
to 78.852.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/27/2024 8:21 AM Jacketed